California, session 20252026, AB2523.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66602.9 is added to the Education Code, to read:66602.9. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Board” means the Trustees of the California State University.(2) “Trustee” means a member of the board.(b) The California State University shall post, in a conspicuous location on the board’s internet website, all of the following for each trustee:(1) The trustee’s name.(2) A short biography of the trustee.(3) The email address assigned by the California State University for conducting official business as a trustee.(4) If assigned by the California State University, the trustee’s telephone number for conducting official business as a trustee.(5) The mailing address used for conducting official business as a trustee.(c) Each trustee is encouraged to consider public and stakeholder input provided to the trustee, as described in subdivision (b), trustee regarding a matter to be presented at an open meeting of the board, board before voting on the matter at the open meeting.SEC. 2. Section 71035 is added to the Education Code, to read:71035. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Board” means the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.(2) “Board member” means a member of the board.(b) The California Community Colleges shall post, in a conspicuous location on the board’s internet website, all of the following for each board member:(1) The board member’s name.(2) A short biography of the board member.(3) The email address assigned by the California Community Colleges for conducting official business as a board member.(4) If assigned by the California Community Colleges, the board member’s telephone number for conducting official business as a board member.(5) The mailing address used for conducting official business as a board member.(c) Each board member is encouraged to consider public and stakeholder input provided to the board member, as described in subdivision (b), member regarding a matter to be presented at an open meeting of the board, board before voting on the matter at the open meeting.SEC. 3. Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 92673) is added to Chapter 6 of Part 57 of Division 9 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 7.6. Regents of the University of California: Biography and Contact Information92673. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Board” means the Regents of the University of California.(2) “Regent” means a member of the board.(b) The University of California is requested to post, in a conspicuous location on the board’s internet website, all of the following for each regent:(1) The regent’s name.(2) A short biography of the regent.(3) The email address assigned by the University of California for conducting official business as a regent.(4) If assigned by the University of California, the regent’s telephone number for conducting official business as a regent.(5) The mailing address used for conducting official business as a regent.(c) Each regent is encouraged to consider public and stakeholder input provided to the regent, as described in subdivision (b), regent regarding a matter to be presented at an open meeting of the board, board before voting on the matter at the open meeting.